Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.050

Conflicts of interest for commissioners, employees, and appointees.

(1) No commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority shall own or hold an interest in any contract or property or engage in any business, transaction, or professional or personal activity, that would:

(a) Be, or appear to be, in conflict with the commissioner's, employee's, or appointee's official duties to any decision-making body for the housing authority duties relating to the housing authority served by or subject to the authority of such commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority;

(b) Secure, or appear to secure, unwarranted privileges or advantages for such commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority, or others; or

(c) Prejudice, or appear to prejudice, such commissioner's, employee's, or appointee's to any decision-making body for the housing authority independence of judgment in exercise of his or her official duties relating to the housing authority served by or subject to the authority of the commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority.

(2) No commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority shall act in an official capacity in any manner in which such commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body of the housing authority has a direct or indirect financial or personal involvement.

(3) No commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority shall use his or her public office or employment to secure financial gain to such commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority.

(4) If any commissioner or employee of an authority or any appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority owns or controls an interest direct or indirect in any property included or planned to be included in any housing project, he or she immediately shall disclose the same in writing to the authority and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Failure to disclose such interest shall constitute misconduct in office. Upon such disclosure such commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body for the housing authority shall not participate in any action by the authority affecting such property.

(5) No provision of this section shall preclude a tenant of the public housing authority from serving as a commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body of the housing authority. No provision of this section shall preclude a tenant of the public housing authority who is serving as a commissioner, employee, or appointee to any decision-making body of the housing authority from voting on any issue or decision, or participating in any action by the authority, unless a conflict of interest, as set forth in subsections (1) through (4) of this section, exists as to that particular tenant and the particular property or interest at issue before, or subject to action by the housing authority.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2124; 1998 c 140 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.82.050. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 6; RRS s 6889-6. Formerly RCW 74.24.050.]